Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.040

Associations deemed nonprofit.

Associations shall be deemed "nonprofit", inasmuch as they are not organized to make profit for themselves, as such, or for their members, as such, but only for their members as producers of fishery products.

[ 1959 c 312 s 4.]